parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST/src/norm-accents.xfst
# ============================================================================
# CONTENT:	(x)fst script for normalizer of unaccented words
#
# LANGUAGE:	PORTUGUESE
# ENCODING:	UTF-8
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	06-Aug-2001
# UPDATED:	04-Aug-2006	AS: converted to UTF-8
# ============================================================================
# USAGE: 	fst -utf8 -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================


echo >>> map (some) accents
# Á Â É Í à á â ã ç è é ê í ó ô õ ö ú ü

regex   
[
 [à|á|â|ã] (<->) a ,	[Á|Â] (<->) A ,
 [è|é|ê] (<->) e , 	[É] (<->) E ,
 [í] (<->) i ,		[Í] (<->) I ,
 [ó|ô|õ] (<->) o ,	[Ó] (<->) O ,
 [ú|ü] (<->) u , 	[Ú] (<->) U ,
 [ç] (<->) c ,		[Ç] (<->) C

];
